hunspell/spanish.aff
SFX N		 ón		 ón		secación
SFX N		 ón		 ón		serción
SFX N		 ón		 ón		setón
SFX N		 ón		 ón		sificación
SFX N		 ón		 ón		sión
SFX N		 on		 ons		lon
SFX N		 ón		 ón		smudación
SFX N		 ón		 ón		solación
SFX N		 ón		 ón		solterón
SFX N		 ón		 ón		solución
SFX N		 on		 ons		on
SFX N		 ón		 ón		són
SFX N		 ón		 ón		sorción
SFX N		 ón		 ón		spección
SFX N		 ón		 ón		spersión
SFX N		 ón		 ón		sposición
SFX N		 ón		 ón		stación
SFX N		 ón		 ón		stantivación
SFX N		 ón		 ón		stigación
SFX N		 ón		 ón		stión
SFX N		 on		 on		ston
SFX N		 ón		 ón		stración
SFX N		 ón		 ón		stricción
SFX N		 ón		 ón		sulfonación
SFX N		 ón		 ón		sunción
SFX N		 ón		 ón		surrección
SFX N		 ón		 ón		tación
SFX N		 ón		 ón		talización
SFX N		 ón		 ón		talón
SFX N		 ón		 ón		temblón
SFX N		 ón		 ón		tención
SFX N		 ón		 ón		teración
SFX N		 ón		 ón		terización
SFX N		 ón		 ón		ternalización
SFX N		 ón		 ón		ternerón
SFX N		 ón		 ón		terón
SFX N		 ón		 ón		tersión
SFX N		 ón		 ón		testación
SFX N		 ón		 ón		ticación
SFX N		 ón		 ón		tición
SFX N		 ón		 ón		ticón
SFX N		 ón		 ón		tificación
SFX N		 ón		 ón		tijón
SFX N		 ón		 ón		tilación
SFX N		 ón		 ón		tillón
SFX N		 ón		 ón		timación
SFX N		 ón		 ón		timización
SFX N		 ón		 ón		tinación
SFX N		 ón		 ón		tión
SFX N		 ón		 ón		tivación
SFX N		 ón		 ón		tivización
SFX N		 ón		 ón		tización
SFX N		 on		 on		ton
SFX N		 ón		 ón		tón
SFX N		 ón		 ón		torización
SFX N		 ón		 ón		toxificación
SFX N		 ón		 ón		tracción
SFX N		 ón		 ón		tración
SFX N		 ón		 ón		tralización
SFX N		 ón		 ón		triación
SFX N		 ón		 ón		tribución
SFX N		 ón		 ón		trición
SFX N		 ón		 ón		trión
SFX N		 ón		 ón		tromisión
SFX N		 ón		 ón		trón
SFX N		 ón		 ón		trospección
SFX N		 ón		 ón		trusión
SFX N		 ón		 ón		tuación
SFX N		 ón		 ón		turación
SFX N		 ón		 ón		uación
SFX N		 ón		 ón		ualización
SFX N		 ón		 ón		ubón
SFX N		 ón		 ón		ucción
SFX N		 ón		 ón		uchón
SFX N		 ón		 ón		ución
SFX N		 ón		 ón		ucón
SFX N		 ón		 ón		udación
SFX N		 ón		 ón		udicación
SFX N		 ón		 ón		uerón
SFX N		 ón		 ón		uetón
SFX N		 ón		 ón		ugación
SFX N		 ón		 ón		uición
SFX N		 ón		 ón		uificación
SFX N		 ón		 ón		uilón
SFX N		 ón		 ón		ujón
SFX N		 ón		 ón		ulación
SFX N		 ón		 ón		ulización
SFX N		 ón		 ón		ulón
SFX N		 ón		 ón		umazón
SFX N		 ón		 ón		umentación
SFX N		 ón		 ón		unción
SFX N		 ón		 ón		unición
SFX N		 ón		 ón		unificación
SFX N		 ón		 ón		unión
SFX N		 ón		 ón		unización
SFX N		 ón		 ón		upación
SFX N		 ón		 ón		uplicación
SFX N		 ón		 ón		uración
SFX N		 ón		 ón		urización
SFX N		 ón		 ón		urón
SFX N		 ón		 ón		usación
SFX N		 ón		 ón		usión
SFX N		 ón		 ón		usón
SFX N		 ón		 ón		utación
SFX N		 ón		 ón		utinización
SFX N		 ón		 ón		vación
SFX N		 ón		 ón		valoración
SFX N		 ón		 ón		valuación
SFX N		 ón		 ón		vección
SFX N		 ón		 ón		vegetación
SFX N		 ón		 ón		velación
SFX N		 ón		 ón		vención
SFX N		 ón		 ón		ventón
SFX N		 ón		 ón		versión
SFX N		 ón		 ón		vicción
SFX N		 ón		 ón		vión
SFX N		 ón		 ón		visión
SFX N		 ón		 ón		vitación
SFX N		 ón		 ón		vitalización
SFX N		 ón		 ón		vización
SFX N		 ón		 ón		xión
SFX N		 ón		 ón		zancón
SFX N		 ón		 ón		zón
SFX N		 o		 oes		o
SFX N		 o		 o		o
SFX N		 oo		 oo		ozoo
SFX N		 oo		 oos		ozoo
SFX N		 oo		 oos		zoo
SFX N		 o		 os		o
SFX N		 op		 opes		alop
SFX N		 op		 opes		galop
SFX N		 op		 opes		lop
SFX N		 op		 opes		op
SFX N		 op		 op		op
SFX N		 op		 ops		op
SFX N		 or		 ora		abrazador
SFX N		 or		 ora		acariciador
SFX N		 or		 ora		acomodador
SFX N		 or		 ora		actor
SFX N		 or		 ora		acunador
SFX N		 or		 ora		admirador
SFX N		 or		 ora		ador
SFX N		 or		 ora		aguador
SFX N		 or		 ora		ajador
SFX N		 or		 ora		alador
SFX N		 or		 ora		alizador
SFX N		 or		 ora		allador
SFX N		 or		 ora		amador
SFX N		 or		 ora		antador
SFX N		 or		 ora		apresador
SFX N		 or		 ora		arrendador
SFX N		 or		 ora		aspersor
SFX N		 or		 ora		atador
SFX N		 or		 or		abador
SFX N		 or		 ora		bajador
SFX N		 or		 or		abor
SFX N		 or		 or		abrazador
SFX N		 or		 ora		cavador
SFX N		 or		 ora		cenador
SFX N		 or		 ora		ceptor
SFX N		 or		 ora		cercenador
SFX N		 or		 ora		cesor
SFX N		 or		 ora		chador
SFX N		 or		 ora		citador
SFX N		 or		 ora		colonizador
SFX N		 or		 or		acondicionador
SFX N		 or		 ora		conquistador
SFX N		 or		 ora		corruptor
SFX N		 or		 or		actador
SFX N		 or		 or		actor
SFX N		 or		 ora		cultor
SFX N		 or		 or		acunador
SFX N		 or		 ora		dador
SFX N		 or		 ora		derramador
SFX N		 or		 ora		desatador
SFX N		 or		 ora		descolonizador
SFX N		 or		 ora		deslustrador
SFX N		 or		 ora		desmembrador
SFX N		 or		 ora		desollador
SFX N		 or		 ora		devorador
SFX N		 or		 ora		diador
SFX N		 or		 ora		dicador
SFX N		 or		 ora		didor
SFX N		 or		 ora		director
SFX N		 or		 ora		dispensador
SFX N		 or		 ora		ditor
SFX N		 or		 or		admirador
SFX N		 or		 or		ador
SFX N		 or		 or		adrador
SFX N		 or		 ora		drador
SFX N		 or		 ora		ductor
SFX N		 or		 ora		eador
SFX N		 or		 ora		eclamador
SFX N		 or		 ora		edidor
SFX N		 or		 ora		editor
SFX N		 or		 ora		edor
SFX N		 or		 ora		eductor
SFX N		 or		 ora		eformador
SFX N		 or		 ora		elador
SFX N		 or		 ora		embrador
SFX N		 or		 ora		emisor
SFX N		 or		 ora		enador
SFX N		 or		 ora		endador
SFX N		 or		 ora		endedor
SFX N		 or		 ora		engendrador
SFX N		 or		 ora		ensador
SFX N		 or		 ora		entidor
SFX N		 or		 ora		entor
SFX N		 or		 ora		envenenador
SFX N		 or		 ora		eor
SFX N		 or		 ora		eparador
SFX N		 or		 ora		epresor
SFX N		 or		 ora		erceptor
SFX N		 or		 ora		erizador
SFX N		 or		 ora		fador
SFX N		 or		 ora		fiador
SFX N		 or		 ora		flagelador
SFX N		 or		 ora		formador
SFX N		 or		 ora		fractor
SFX N		 or		 or		agador
SFX N		 or		 ora		gador
SFX N		 or		 ora		genitor
SFX N		 or		 ora		gnador
SFX N		 or		 ora		guador
SFX N		 or		 or		ahorrador
SFX N		 or		 ora		iador
SFX N		 or		 ora		ializador
SFX N		 or		 ora		icador
SFX N		 or		 ora		iciador
SFX N		 or		 ora		icultor
SFX N		 or		 ora		idor
SFX N		 or		 ora		ijador
SFX N		 or		 ora		ilador
SFX N		 or		 ora		illador
SFX N		 or		 ora		imador
SFX N		 or		 ora		injuriador
SFX N		 or		 ora		inmolador
SFX N		 or		 ora		instituidor
SFX N		 or		 ora		interceptor
SFX N		 or		 ora		ipiador
SFX N		 or		 ora		irador
SFX N		 or		 ora		islador
SFX N		 or		 ora		ivador
SFX N		 or		 ora		izador
SFX N		 or		 or		ajador
SFX N		 or		 ora		jador
SFX N		 or		 ora		judicador
SFX N		 or		 or		alador
SFX N		 or		 ora		lador
SFX N		 or		 ora		leccionador
SFX N		 or		 ora		levantador
SFX N		 or		 or		alijador
SFX N		 or		 or		alimentador
SFX N		 or		 or		alizador
SFX N		 or		 or		allador
SFX N		 or		 ora		llador
SFX N		 or		 ora		loador
SFX N		 or		 or		alor
SFX N		 or		 ora		ltador
SFX N		 or		 ora		lustrador
SFX N		 or		 or		amador
SFX N		 or		 ora		mbrador
SFX N		 or		 ora		mizador
SFX N		 or		 or		anador
SFX N		 or		 ora		nador
SFX N		 or		 or		añador
SFX N		 or		 ora		ndador
SFX N		 or		 ora		ndedor
SFX N		 or		 or		animador
SFX N		 or		 or		anizador
SFX N		 or		 ora		nizador
SFX N		 or		 ora		nsor
SFX N		 or		 or		antador
SFX N		 or		 ora		nteador
SFX N		 or		 ora		ntor
SFX N		 or		 ora		obrador
SFX N		 or		 ora		obstructor
SFX N		 or		 ora		ocador
SFX N		 or		 ora		ofador
SFX N		 or		 ora		ojador
SFX N		 or		 ora		olador
SFX N		 or		 ora		onizador
SFX N		 or		 ora		or
SFX N		 or		 ora		orador
SFX N		 or		 ora		oreador
SFX N		 or		 ora		osador
SFX N		 or		 ora		otador
SFX N		 or		 ora		otor
SFX N		 or		 ora		paseador
SFX N		 or		 ora		perjudicador
SFX N		 or		 ora		pleiteador
SFX N		 or		 ora		preconizador
SFX N		 or		 ora		prevaricador
SFX N		 or		 ora		principiador
SFX N		 or		 ora		prohijador
SFX N		 or		 ora		ptor
SFX N		 or		 ora		pulverizador
SFX N		 or		 ora		querellador
SFX N		 or		 ora		quilador
SFX N		 or		 or		aquillador
SFX N		 or		 ora		ractor
SFX N		 or		 ora		rador
SFX N		 or		 ora		rajador
SFX N		 or		 ora		ramador
SFX N		 or		 ora		rchador
SFX N		 or		 ora		reador
SFX N		 or		 ora		recedor
SFX N		 or		 ora		receptor
SFX N		 or		 ora		recitador
SFX N		 or		 ora		reengendrador
SFX N		 or		 ora		remisor
